Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.353

Rules—Compliance with federal requirements.

(1) The director may adopt rules:

(a) To support the agriculture industry in meeting federal requirements for the country-of-origin labeling of meat. Any requirements established under this subsection for country of origin labeling purposes shall be substantially consistent with and shall not exceed the requirements established by the United States department of agriculture; and

(b) In consultation with the livestock identification advisory committee under RCW 16.57.015, to implement federal requirements for animal identification needed to trace the source of livestock for disease control and response purposes.

(2) The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with other states and agencies of federal government to carry out such systems and to promote consistency of regulation.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 52; 2004 c 233 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.